Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1905
Electric utility; duties.

An electric utility shall:

(1) Consider mechanisms to encourage the aggregation of C-BED projects located in the same general geographical area;

(2) Require any qualified owner to provide sufficient security to assure performance under the power purchase agreement; and

(3) Annually prepare a statement by March 1 summarizing its efforts to purchase energy from C-BED projects, including a list of the C-BED projects under a power purchase agreement and the amount of C-BED project energy purchased. The statement shall be posted on the electric utility's web site.

Laws 2007, LB629, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 3.